Utah statutes.
7-14-2.   Legislative findings.
The substantial financial loss to the state and to trade and commerce within
this state resulting from the dishonor or other return of checks, drafts, or
other orders for the payment of money, including transactions to be
consummated by electronic means, requires concerted effort by financial
institutions to attempt to minimize the number of such occurrences. The
Legislature finds that to facilitate such concerted effort adequate protection
against liability of the participating financial institutions is necessary.
